Missouri, session 2026, HB2139.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 506 and 508, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 506.602 and 508.074, to read as follows:
506.602. 1. As used in this section, the term "foreign law, legal code, or system"
shall mean any legal framework from a jurisdiction outside of any state or territory of
the United States, including international organizations and tribunals.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, application of any foreign
law, legal code, or system that denies the parties the fundamental liberties, rights, and
privileges guaranteed under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of
Missouri shall be prohibited. Any legal document or court decision that purports to
apply any such foreign law, legal code, or system shall be void and unenforceable.
3. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to:
(1) Disapprove or abrogate existing precedent of the Missouri supreme court;
(2) Limit adjudication of ecclesiastical matters of a religious organization,
including the selection, appointment, discipline, or removal of clergy or interpretation of
doctrine;
(3) Apply to corporations, partnerships, or associations that voluntarily subject
themselves to foreign law or courts; or
(4) Apply where federal law preempts state law, including obligations under
treaties or international agreements.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2139 & 2175 2
508.074. No state court, arbitration panel, tribunal, or administrative agency
shall transfer any civil action if such transfer would result in the application of any
foreign law, legal code, or system that would violate or likely violate the fundamental
liberties, rights, and privileges of the parties guaranteed under the Constitution of the
United States or the Constitution of Missouri.
✔